Massachusetts, session 194th, H4056.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the number of
members on the Lanesborough Select Board shall be increased from three (3) to five (5). The
Select Board shall annually elect a chairperson from among its members following Town
Election.
SECTION 2. At the first Annual Town Election to occur following the passage of this act
by the general court, three (3) Select Board members shall be elected. The candidate receiving
the highest number of votes in that election shall serve a three (3) year term, the candidate
receiving the second highest number of votes shall serve a two (2) year term and the candidate
receiving the third highest number of votes shall serve a one (1) year term. Thereafter, as the
term of Select Board expires, successors shall be elected for terms of three (3) years.
of 2

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage, or take any other action relative
thereto.
of 2